Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3625
Effect on other laws of member state.

(a) Nothing in the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.

(b) All laws in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(c) All lawful actions of the interstate commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the commission, are binding upon the member states.

(d) All agreements between the interstate commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

(e) In the event any provision of the compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 25.